Utah statutes.
58-22-401.   Grounds for denial of license and disciplinary proceedings.

The division may refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew the license of a licensee, revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and issue cease and desist orders in accordance with Section 58-1-401.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 274, 1994 General Session

